src/fst/morphology/affixes/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON ADJ_EHYT
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 43 front
!!€  ehyt: ehyt+A+Sg+Nom # unbroken
0:t  ADJ_FRONT_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:e  ADJ_FRONT_SINGULARS  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_PLURALS  ;
0:t  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ  ;
0:e  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:0  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:e  ADJ_FRONT_COMPARATIVE  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE  ;

!! ### Lexicalised nut-participles
!!  Majority of lexicalised nut participles are adjectives.

LEXICON ADJ_KULUNUT
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 47 back
!!€  kulunut: kulunut+A+Sg+Nom # used
0:ut  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:ee  ADJ_BACK_SINGULARS  ;
0:e  ADJ_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0:ut  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA  ;
0:ee  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_SEEN  ;
0:e  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA  ;
0:e  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:e  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:e  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0:e  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:ee  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:e  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;

LEXICON ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 47 front
!!€  ällistynyt: ällistynyt+A+Sg+Nom # amazed
0:yt  ADJ_FRONT_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:ee  ADJ_FRONT_SINGULARS  ;
0:e  ADJ_FRONT_PLURALS  ;
0:yt  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ  ;
0:ee  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_SEEN  ;
0:e  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ  ;
0:e  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:e  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:e  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0:e  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:ee  ADJ_FRONT_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:e  ADJ_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE  ;

!! ### Old -e^ final stems

LEXICON ADJ_AHNE
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 48 back
!!€  ahne: ahne+A+Sg+Nom # greedy
0  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:e  ADJ_BACK_SINGULARS  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0:t  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA  ;
0:e  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_SEEN  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:0  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:e  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;

:he  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE_ARCHAIC  ;


LEXICON ADJ_TERVE
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 48 front
!!€  terve: terve+A+Sg+Nom # healthy
0  ADJ_FRONT_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:e  ADJ_FRONT_SINGULARS  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_PLURALS  ;
0:t  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ  ;
0:e  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_SEEN  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:0  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:e  ADJ_FRONT_COMPARATIVE  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE  ;

!
LEXICON ADJ_KADE
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 48 d~t back
!!€  kade: kade+A+Sg+Nom # jealous
0:de  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:tee  ADJ_BACK_SINGULARS  ;
0:te  ADJ_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0:det  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA  ;
0:tee  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_SEEN  ;
0:te  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA  ;
0:te  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:te  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:de  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0:te  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;

LEXICON ADJ_HELLE
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 48 l~t back
!!€  helle: helle+A+Sg+Nom # warm weather
0:le  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:tee  ADJ_BACK_SINGULARS  ;
0:te  ADJ_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0:let  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA  ;
0:tee  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_SEEN  ;
0:te  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA  ;
0:te  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:te  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:te  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0:te  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;

!!  Gapping almost all variants of gradations with e, as well as all dual
!!  nominative stems.

!! ### Exceptional adjectives
!!  The ones that do not fit in the official classes shown in dictionaries.

LEXICON ADJ_PITKÄ
!!€gt-norm:  Adjective pitkä
!!€  pitkä: pitkä+A+Sg+Nom
!!€  pidempi: pitkä+A+Comp+Sg+Nom
!!€  pisin: pitkä+A+Superl+Sg+Nom
0:tkä  ADJ_FRONT_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:tkä  ADJ_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:tkä  ADJ_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:tk  ADJ_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:tk  ADJ_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:tkä  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä  ;
0:tkä  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÄN  ;
0:tk  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ  ;
0:tk  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
0:tkä  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_IN  ;
0:tk  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN  ;
0:de  ADJ_FRONT_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:s  ADJ_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE  ;

LEXICON ADJ_PARAS

0:a  ADJ_BACK_H_PLURALS_ARCHAIC  ;

0:aha  ADJ_BACK_SINGULARS_ARCHAIC  ;

0:as  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:as  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA  ;
0:as  ADJ_COMPOUND_0  ;

0:haa  ADJ_BACK_SINGULARS  ;
0:haa  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_SEEN  ;

0:ha  ADJ_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0:ha  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA  ;
0:ha  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:ha  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:ha  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0:ha  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;

LEXICON ADJ_OIKEE
!! THE EPSILON-to-ZILCH SEEMS TO INTERFER WITH COMPILATION 2015-08-23, Jaska
!! 0:  >> 0:0 SO TOMMI FINDS THEM
0:0  ADJ_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0:0  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA  ;
0:0  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:0  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:0  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0:0  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;

0:e  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:e  ADJ_BACK_SINGULARS  ;
0:e  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA  ;
0:e  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_SEEN  ;
0:e  ADJ_COMPOUND_0  ;

:e  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;

LEXICON ADJ_AINUT
!! THE EPSILON-to-ZILCH SEEMS TO INTERFER WITH COMPILATION 2015-08-23, Jaska
!! 0:  >> 0:0 SO TOMMI FINDS THEM
0:0  ADJ_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0:0  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA  ;
0:0  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:0  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:0  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0:0  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;

0:t  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:t  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA  ;
0:t  ADJ_COMPOUND_0  ;

0:u  ADJ_BACK_SINGULARS  ;
0:u  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_SEEN  ;


!! ### Plurales tantum?
!!  Adjectives aren't typically plural words, but there are some in the
!!  dictionaries.

LEXICON ADJ_LEUATTOMAT
!!€gt-norm:  Adjective plurales
!!€  leuattomat: leuattomat+A+Pl+Nom # ?
0:toma  ADJ_BACK_PLNOM_CLIT  ;
0:toma  ADJ_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0:tom  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA  ;
0:tom  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
0:toma  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IN  ;
+Use/NG:on  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_TEN  ;
0:tom  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN  ;
0:toma  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:tom  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;



LEXICON ADJ_KOLMAS

:n	ADJ_BACK_ESSIVE_NA_ARCHAIC ;

:nne	ADJ_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS ;

:ns	ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA ;

:ns	ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN ;

:ns	ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN ;

:ns	ADJ_BACK_PLURALS ;

:nte	ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN ;

:nte	ADJ_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS ;

:s	ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE ;

:t	ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA ;

LEXICON ADJ_NELJÄS

:n	ADJ_FRONT_ESSIVE_NÄ_ARCHAIC ;

:nne	ADJ_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS ;

:ns	ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ ;

:ns	ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN ;

:ns	ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN ;

:ns	ADJ_FRONT_PLURALS ;

:nte	ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN ;

:nte	ADJ_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS ;

:s	ADJ_FRONT_NOMINATIVE ;

:t	ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ ;





!! ## Adjective inflection proper



LEXICON ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE
!! The superlative derivation is formed by in suffix, which creates a new
!! adjective baseform. This baseform is handled separately to avoid double
!! superlatives.
!!€gt-norm: Adjective superlative front
!!€ rumin: ruma+A+Superl+Sg+Nom # ugliest
+Superl:»i  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE_STEMS ;


LEXICON ADJ_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE
!!€gt-norm: Adjective superlative back
!!€ tyhmin: tyhmä+A+Superl+Sg+Nom # stupidest
+Superl:»i  ADJ_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE_STEMS ;

LEXICON ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE
!! The comparative derivation is formed by mpi suffix, which creates a new
!! adjective baseform. This adjective is handled separately
!! to avoid double comparative forms.
!!€gt-norm: Adjective comparative front
!!€ rumempi: ruma+A+Comp+Sg+Nom
+Comp:»m     ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE_STEMS ;

LEXICON ADJ_FRONT_COMPARATIVE
!!€gt-norm: Adjective comparative back
!!€ tyhmempi: tyhmä+A+Comp+Sg+Nom
+Comp:»m     ADJ_FRONT_COMPARATIVE_STEMS ;
